Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-3534
Forfeiture of instrument; when; procedure.

If a replaced, repaired, or calibrated radiological instrument has not been receipted from the department by the responsible agency sixty days after the completed replacement, repair, or calibration date, the department shall provide written notification to the responsible agency that failure to receipt such instrument within ninety days after the completion date shall result in forfeiture of such instrument. Written notification to the responsible agency shall be made a total of three times with not less than five working days between notifications. If, after proper notification and ninety days after the completion date, such instrument has not been receipted from the department by the responsible agency, the instrument shall become the property of the State of Nebraska and shall be available for issue by the department to other responsible agencies who agree to be responsible for the replacement, repair, and calibration of the radiological instrument or the instrument shall be turned in as surplus property.

Laws 2006, LB 787, § 6;

Laws 2009, LB24, § 2.